Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4481.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5p. The department of attorney general shall establish and maintain a concealed pistol license reciprocity website that does all of the following: (a) Lists all states that grant reciprocity to an individual who has been issued a concealed pistol license under section 5b. (b) For each state listed under subdivision (a), list the rules and restrictions that the individual who has been issued a concealed pistol license under section 5b must follow while carrying a concealed pistol in that state.